services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/ga_IE.aff
# myspell affix file for Irish by Kevin Scannell
# I created this file by converting my ispell affix file on 5 August 2002
# Exactly the same set of affixes, except one can avoid the acrobatics
# for the verb "buígh" because myspell is a bit smarter about combining affixes
#
#               ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
#               ****** ******     ***      
#
# Copyright 2002 Kevin P. Scannell
#
#    This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
#    (at your option) any later version.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#    You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#    along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#    Foundation, Inc., 675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA.
#
#
# Consult the web page
#
#   http://borel.slu.edu/~kps/ispell/index.html
#
# for detailed information about these packages and installation information.

SET UTF-8

TRY aihnrsetcdoglumbíéáfóúpvjzxywqk

# séimhiú (only place where capitals are required)
PFX S Y 18
PFX S b bh b
PFX S B Bh B
PFX S c ch c
PFX S C Ch C
PFX S d dh d
PFX S D Dh D
PFX S f fh f
PFX S F Fh F
PFX S g gh g
PFX S G Gh G
PFX S m mh m
PFX S M Mh M
PFX S p ph p
PFX S P Ph P
PFX S s sh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX S S Sh S[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX S t th t
PFX S T Th T

# urú
PFX U Y 16
PFX U 0 m b[^h]
PFX U bh mb bh
PFX U 0 g c[^h]
PFX U ch gc ch
PFX U 0 n d[^h\']
PFX U dh nd dh
PFX U 0 bh f[^h]
PFX U fh bhf fh
PFX U 0 n g[^h]
PFX U gh ng gh
PFX U 0 b p[^h]
PFX U ph bp ph
PFX U 0 d t[^h]
PFX U th dt th
PFX U d' n- d'[aeiouáéíóú]
PFX U 0 n- [aeiouáéíóú]

#  b'
PFX B N 2
PFX B 0 b' [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX B f b'fh f

# h
PFX H Y 1
PFX H 0 h [aeiouáéíóú]
 
#  m'
PFX M N 2
PFX M 0 m' [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX M f m'fh f

#  d'
PFX D N 2
PFX D 0 d' [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX D f d'fh f

# t-
PFX T N 2
PFX T 0 t- [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX T 0 t s
 
# "leideanna"
PFX L Y 180
PFX L 0 an- [^bcfgmp]
PFX L b an-bh b
PFX L c an-ch c
PFX L f an-fh f
PFX L g an-gh g
PFX L m an-mh m
PFX L p an-ph p
PFX L 0 dea- [^bcdfgmpst]
PFX L 0 dea- s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s dea-sh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L b dea-bh b
PFX L c dea-ch c
PFX L d dea-dh d
PFX L f dea-fh f
PFX L g dea-gh g
PFX L m dea-mh m
PFX L p dea-ph p
PFX L t dea-th t
PFX L 0 ain [deéiílnrst]
PFX L b ainbh b
PFX L c ainch c
PFX L f ainfh f
PFX L g aingh g
PFX L m ainmh m
PFX L p ainph p
PFX L 0 ath [^bcdfgmpst]
PFX L b athbh b
PFX L c athch c
PFX L d athdh d
PFX L f athfh f
PFX L g athgh g
PFX L m athmh m
PFX L p athph p
PFX L 0 a t
PFX L 0 ath s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s athsh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 comh [^bcdfgmnpst]
PFX L b comhbh b
PFX L c comhch c
PFX L d comhdh d
PFX L f comhfh f
PFX L g comhgh g
PFX L p comhph p
PFX L t comhth t
PFX L 0 comh s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s comhsh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L m cómh m[aáoóuú]
PFX L m cóimh m[eéií]
PFX L 0 có n[aáoóuú]
PFX L 0 cói n[eéií]
PFX L 0 do- [^bcdfglmnprst]
PFX L 0 do [lnr]
PFX L b dobh b
PFX L c doch c
PFX L d dodh d
PFX L f dofh f
PFX L g dogh g
PFX L m domh m
PFX L p doph p
PFX L t doth t
PFX L 0 do s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s dosh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 droch [^bcdfgmpst]
PFX L b drochbh b
PFX L c droch-ch c
PFX L d drochdh d
PFX L f drochfh f
PFX L g drochgh g
PFX L m drochmh m
PFX L p drochph p
PFX L t drochth t
PFX L 0 droch s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s drochsh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 for [^bcdfgmprst]
PFX L b forbh b
PFX L c forch c
PFX L d fordh d
PFX L f forfh f
PFX L g forgh g
PFX L m formh m
PFX L p forph p
PFX L 0 for- r
PFX L t forth t
PFX L 0 for s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s forsh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 fo- [^bcdfglmnprst]
PFX L 0 fo [lnr]
PFX L b fobh b
PFX L c foch c
PFX L d fodh d
PFX L f fofh f
PFX L g fogh g
PFX L m fomh m
PFX L p foph p
PFX L t foth t
PFX L 0 fo s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s fosh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 frith [^bcdfgmpst]
PFX L b frithbh b
PFX L c frithch c
PFX L d frithdh d
PFX L f frithfh f
PFX L g frithgh g
PFX L m frithmh m
PFX L p frithph p
PFX L 0 fri t
PFX L 0 frith s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s frithsh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 il [^bcfgmp]
PFX L b ilbh b
PFX L c ilch c
PFX L f ilfh f
PFX L g ilgh g
PFX L m ilmh m
PFX L p ilph p
PFX L 0 im [^bcdfgmpst]
PFX L b imbh b
PFX L c imch c
PFX L d imdh d
PFX L f imfh f
PFX L g imgh g
PFX L p imph p
PFX L t imth t
PFX L 0 im s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s imsh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 in [^bcfgmnp]
PFX L b inbh b
PFX L c inch c
PFX L f infh f
PFX L g ingh g
PFX L m inmh m
PFX L p inph p
PFX L 0 in- n
PFX L 0 mí- [^bcdfglmnprst]
PFX L 0 mí [lnr]
PFX L b míbh b
PFX L c mích c
PFX L d mídh d
PFX L f mífh f
PFX L g mígh g
PFX L m mímh m
PFX L p míph p
PFX L t míth t
PFX L 0 mí s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s mísh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 réamh [^bcdfgmpst]
PFX L b réamhbh b
PFX L c réamhch c
PFX L d réamhdh d
PFX L f réamhfh f
PFX L g réamhgh g
PFX L m réamh-mh m
PFX L p réamhph p
PFX L t réamhth t
PFX L 0 réamh s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s réamhsh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 ró- [^bcdfglmnprst]
PFX L 0 ró [lnr]
PFX L b róbh b
PFX L c róch c
PFX L d ródh d
PFX L f rófh f
PFX L g rógh g
PFX L m rómh m
PFX L p róph p
PFX L t róth t
PFX L 0 ró s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s rósh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L 0 so- [^bcdfglmnprst]
PFX L 0 so [lnr]
PFX L b sobh b
PFX L c soch c
PFX L d sodh d
PFX L f sofh f
PFX L g sogh g
PFX L m somh m
PFX L p soph p
PFX L t soth t
PFX L 0 so s[^aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX L s sosh s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
