services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/ga_IE.dic
abhcóideachta/HBMDU
abhraisí/HBMDU
acastóir/HBMDUT
achainíoch/HBMDUT
achomharc/HBMDUT
achtáilte/HUBMD
adhaltranaím/HUC
adhastar/HBMDUT
adhlacóir/HBMDUT
adhmainteacha/HBU
adhmhilleadh/HUBMDT
aelusa/HBMDU
aerála/HBMDU
aerobacha/HBU
aeróga/HBMDU
aerthriomú/HUBMDT
agáite/HBMDU
agh/HBMDU
áibhéile/HBMDU
áibhirseora/HBMDU
aibhléise/HBMDU
aicearrachtaí/HBMDU
aidhmeanna/HBMDU
aidréanailín/HBMDUT
aiféaltas/HBMDUT
aifidí/HBMDU
aighneasacha/HBU
áiléir/HBMDU
ailléirgeacha/HBU
ailtéarnóra/HBMDU
ailtirí/HBMDU
aimeiriciam/HBMDUT
aimhneasach/HBU
aimridiú/HBMDUT
aincheiste/HBMDU
ainciseora/HBMDU
ainéistéisí/HBMDUT
ainmchlár/HBMDUT
ainmheasarthachta/HBMDU
ainrianta/HBU
ainseabhaithe/HBMDU
aintiarnaí/HBMDU
aireagán/HBMDUT
airge/HBMDU
airgeadán/HBMDUT
airgeadú/HUBMDT
airtríteas/HBMDUT
aisfhuaimniú/HBMDUT
aisghabh/HU
aisghníomhaigh/HBU
aisréadóirí/HBMDU
aitheanta/HBMDU
aithint/HBMDU
aithnide/HBMDU
áitiú/HBMDUT
albastar/HBMDUT
alcólaigh/HBMDU
allmhaireora/HBMDU
alpadh/HUBMDT
alpán/HBMDUT
amaideacht/HBMDU
amhábhair/HBMDU
ámharaí/HBMDU
amhrán/HBMDUT
amscála/HBMDUT
an-airde/HBU
anailgéisí/HBU
anamchairdeas/HBMDUT
anbhá/HBMDUT
anbháis/HBMDU
andúiligh/HBMDU
anglán/HBMDUT
anóitigh/HBU
antaiseipteán/HBMDUT
antatocsainí/HBMDU
aolaim/HUA
aonaigh/HBMDU
aonchéileachas/HBMDUT
aonphléacs/HBMDUT
aonteangacha/HBU
apacrafúla/HBU
aralt/HBMDUT
áranna/HBMDU
araoid/HBMDU
arathar/HBMDUT
ardléannta/HBU
armáid/HBMDU
armónach/HBMDUT
asáilia/HBMDU
asamtóitigh/HBU
asfailt/HBMDU
asparagas/HBMDUT
athartha/HBMDU
athbhánta/HBMDU
athbhladhma/HBMDU
athchló/HBMDUT
athfhill/HU
athfhillidh/HBMDU
athfhuaimniú/HUBMDT
athluaiteachas/HBMDUT
athmhachnaimh/HBMDU
athraonadh/HBMDUT
athshondacha/HBU
atreorú/HBMDUT
báíocht/US
bándearg/US
básacháin/US
béalaithris/US
bhachlaínn/FU
biogóideacht/US
bláthfhleisce/US
bogásacha/US
bónais/US
braisle/US
breillice/US
briseán/US
buachaill/US
Búdaipeist/S
buta/US
cág/US
caisealta/US
cáithní/US
caolagrach/US
caomhnaitheach/US
céadchosaigh/US
céadscoth/US
ceathairchosach/US
ceathrachad/US
chónaínn/FU
cinnteach/US
cipínigh/US
clárú/US
clingeach/US
cluinimid/US
cneasluiteacha/US
coigistíochta/US
coincheaptha/US
coiteoir/US
comhardaím/USC
comhlachais/US
comhthomhaiseacha/US
constábla/US
corrshleasaigh/US
craifte/US
creatúla/US
crobhaingeach/US
cruacht/US
cuail/US
cúiréir/US
cúlchoimhéadaim/USA
cúrsóir/US
d'imeascainn/EU
dalldramáin/US
danarthacht/US
déantúsaíochta/US
dearscnaithigh/US
deoirgháis/US
dheighil/U
díleách/US
dingim/USA
dispeansáide/US
dleacht/US
domhillte/US
dorchú/US
droimnochta/US
drualus/US
dúspéisiúil/US
eabhadh/HBMDUT
eachlaisí/HBMDU
eachtraigh/HBU
éadar/HBMDUT
éadroime/HBMDU
éadrom-mheáchan/HBMDUT
eagarthóireacht/HBMDU
éaglainne/HBMDU
eagruithe/HBMDU
éalaigh/HU
ealtú/HUBMDT
eantrópacht/HBMDU
éarlais/HBMDU
earráidí/HBMDU
éasc/HBMDUT
easonóir/HBMDU
easpartana/HBMDU
easpráid/HBMDU
éigean/HBMDUT
éigeandáil/HBMDU
éighnéasaigh/HBU
éillithe/HUBMD
einsímí/HBMDU
eipeod/HBMDUT
eirleach/HBMDUT
eiseachais/HBMDU
eisean/H
eisfheartha/HUBMD
eisíth/HBMDU
eithneacháin/HBMDU
eitleacha/HBU
eitleán/HBMDUT
eotanáise/HBMDU
fabraice/BMDUS
fachaile/BMDUS
faicseanachta/BMDUS
faighneoige/BMDUS
fáilteach/BUS
fáirthe/USBMD
fáiteall/BMDUS
faltanasach/BUS
faobhraithe/USBMD
faoilligh/BMDUS
farasbairr/BMDUS
feadha/BMDUS
feag/BMDUS
fealltaigh/BUS
fearúil/BUS
feic/BMDUS
féilíochta/BMDUS
feiliúnachta/BMDUS
feirbín/BMDUS
feisciú/BMDUS
feolta/BMDUS
fiacail/BMDUS
fiachóir/BMDUS
fíf/BMDUS
fillteoga/BMDUS
finscéalacha/BUS
fíona/BMDUS
fionnmhóna/BMDUS
fíoraíocht/BMDUS
fiosrúchán/BMDUS
flainín/BMDUS
flaithiúlachta/BMDUS
flústaireachta/BMDUS
focalbhá/BMDUS
fochaill/BMDUS
fogais/BUS
foghlaera/BMDUS
foilseachán/BMDUS
foircnigh/BUS
folláine/BMDUS
follasa/BUS
fóram/BMDUS
Forann/S
forchás/BMDUS
forlámhaithe/USBMD
formáid/BMDUS
forualaithe/USBMD
fosfar/BMDUS
frámaithe/USBMD
fraochán/BMDUS
freangadh/BMDUS
friothálaí/BMDUS
frith-chuaranfaí/BMDUS
frithchaiteoir/BMDUS
frithsheipteáin/BMDUS
fuaidirí/BMDUS
fual/BMDUS
fuinnimh/BMDUS
fuinseach/BUS
fuinsí/BUS
gabúnaigh/US
galbhruith/US
garaonta/US
gealóga/US
gearrscéil/US
gin/US
giofaireachta/US
gléice/US
gliocról/US
goillte/US
gormú/US
greannaitheachta/US
gríodán/US
gusmhaire/US
iall/HBMDU
iarbhearta/HBMDU
iarchomhad/HBMDUT
iarla/HBMDUT
iarnálaim/HUI
iaró/HBMDUT
iarthair/HBMDU
iascra/HBMDUT
idé-eolaithe/HBMDU
idéalachais/HBMDU
idirstad/HBMDUT
ife/HUB
ilchumaisc/HBMDU
ileochracha/HBMDU
ilspíosra/HBMDUT
imchruth/HBMDUT
imithe/HUB
imlínte/HBMDU
imreoga/HBMDU
imrothlú/HBMDUT
imscaoilte/HUBMD
inbhéartacha/HBU
ingearaí/HBU
iniseal/HBMDUT
inléiteacht/HBMDU
innealtóir/HBMDUT
inpháirtigh/HBU
intinneach/HBU
intlis/HBMDU
íobartaigh/HBMDU
íoc/HBMDUT
iolraigh/HBMDU
iolraím/HUC
iomarbhas/HBMDUT
íomháineachta/HBMDU
iomlatach/HBU
ionannú/HBMDUT
ionchúisimh/HBMDU
ionlainne/HBMDU
ionsaitheoir/HBMDUT
ionsoilsithe/HUBMD
íosóipe/HBMDU
iostaí/HBMDU
irisleabhar/HBMDUT
ispíní/HBMDU
malartaí/S
masacas/S
meicneachais/S
míghnaíúil/S
mírúin/S
mórfhoclaigh/S
músclóirí/S
ó/HBMDUT
ochtaihéadrán/HBMDUT
ochtamháin/HBMDU
ogastúin/HBMDU
oideas/HBMDUT
oifigiúlachas/HBMDUT
óige/HBMDU
oighearshruth/HBMDUT
oireachtas/HBMDUT
oirfidí/HBU
oiriúnuithe/HBMDU
ollbhealaigh/HBMDU
ollbhrathadóir/HBMDUT
ollchóiriú/HBMDUT
ológa/HBMDU
onóracha/HBMDU
oráiste/HBMDUT
órnite/HBU
ortadóntóir/HBMDUT
ortadóntóirí/HBMDU
ortagrafaí/HBU
osbhuí/HBMDUT
otrann/HBMDU
pasálaim/USI
péacadh/US
piocóidí/US
piréise/US
pocáilte/US
póire/US
preasa/US
prímhid/US
sabhaircínigh/ST
sábhálaigh/S
saghdair/ST
saileacháin/ST
saineolais/ST
sáithithe/ST
samhraí/S
samhraithe/ST
saoirsithe/ST
saothair/ST
seabhaic/ST
seacláid/ST
sealadóir/S
séalaithe/ST
seaniarainn/ST
seiceadóireacht/ST
séimeantach/S
seirdín/ST
siada/ST
sin-seanathar/ST
Sínise/S
síolaithe/ST
síothláin/ST
slabhairíní/S
sláid/ST
sléibhteoireacht/ST
sloigisc/ST
snafacha/S
sneatair/ST
soighe/ST
solasmhair/S
somhaoin/ST
srapnail/ST
suaiteacht/ST
suanghalar/S
súipín/ST
tábhachtaigh/US
taidhleoirí/US
tangant/US
tarlóirí/US
téarnaím/USC
teileascópacha/US
thrasnaínn/FU
tionscnamh/US
tobathrú/US
tolglanna/US
tórraithe/US
tréadúla/US
treoshuíomh/US
troscaidh/US
turtair/US
uaigneas/HBMDUT
uallán/HBMDUT
uallfairtí/HBMDU
uanach/HBU
uathoibrithe/HUBMD
uathphíolótaí/HBMDU
ubhsceite/HUBMD
uiliteacha/HBU
uimhirphláta/HBMDUT
úinéir/HBMDUT
uiríoll/HBMDUT
ulchabháin/HBMDU
upa/HBMDU
urchóideacha/HBU
urphost/HBMDUT
urscartadh/HUBMDT
úsáideoir/HBMDUT
úsairí/HBMDU
